Utah statutes.
72-5-303.   Maintenance -- Impact on adjacent land owners.

(1) (a)  The state and its political subdivisions are not required to maintain highways within R.S. 2477 rights-of-way for vehicular travel unless the R.S. 2477 right-of-way encompasses a highway included on a highway system for vehicular travel.

(b)  A decision to improve or not improve an R.S. 2477 right-of-way is a purely discretionary function.

(2)  The holder of an R.S. 2477 right-of-way and the owner of the servient estate shall exercise their rights without unreasonably interfering with one another.

(3)  The holder of the R.S. 2477 right-of-way shall design and conduct construction and maintenance activities so as to minimize impacts on adjacent federal public lands, consistent with applicable safety standards.

